New Mexico, session 2026, HB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the cultural affairs department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for a feasibility study and planning and implementation for a lowrider museum in Espanola. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233593.1